Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 1. Adult Services.

§ 63.2-1600.
Home-based services.

Each local board shall provide for the delivery of home-based services that include homemaker, companion, or chore services that will allow individuals to attain or maintain self-care and are likely to prevent or reduce dependency, subject to the supervision and in accordance with regulations of the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services as provided in Article 4 (§

51.5-144

et seq.) of Chapter 14 of Title 51.5. Eligibility for such services shall be determined according to regulations of the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services. Such services shall be provided to the extent that federal or state matching funds are made available to each locality.

History.

983, c. 605, § 63.1-55.01; 2002, c. 747; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Effective date.

This title became effective October 1, 2002.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 62 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending §§

63.2-100

,

63.2-313

,

63.2-315

,

63.2-405

,

63.2-1600

,

63.2-1601

,

63.2-1602

,

63.2-1605

, and

63.2-1606

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 65 provides: “That effective July 1, 2013, the regulations of the Board of Social Services promulgated pursuant to §

63.2-217

, related to administration of auxiliary grants pursuant to §

63.2-800

, and adult services provided pursuant to Article 1 (§

63.2-1600

et seq.) and adult protective services provided pursuant to Article 2 (§

63.2-1603

) of Chapter 16 of Title 63.2 shall be administered by the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services and shall remain in full force and effect until the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services promulgates regulations pursuant to the 64th enactment of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 67 provides: “That as of July 1, 2012, the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall be deemed successor in interest to the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties. All right, title, and interest in and to any tangible personal property vested in the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties as of the effective date of this act shall be transferred to and taken as standing in the name of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, effective July 1, 2013, are identical, and rewrote the first two sentences, which formerly read: “Each local board shall provide, subject to the supervision of the Commissioner and in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board, for the delivery of home-based services that include homemaker, companion or chore services that will allow individuals to attain or maintain self-care and are likely to prevent or reduce dependency. Eligibility for such services shall be determined according to regulations adopted by the Board.”

§ 63.2-1601.
Authority to provide adult foster care services.

Each local board is authorized to provide adult foster care services that may include recruitment, approval, and supervision subject to the supervision and in accordance with regulations of the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services as provided in Article 4 (§

51.5-144

et seq.) of Chapter 14 of Title 51.5.

History.

1978, c. 180, § 63.1-55.1:1; 2002, c. 747; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, effective July 1, 2013, are identical, and substituted “supervision subject to the supervision and in accordance with regulations of the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services as provided in Article 4 (§

51.5-144

et seq.) of Chapter 14 of Title 51.5” for “supervision in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board.”

§ 63.2-1601.1.
Criminal history check for agency approved providers of services to adults.

Each local board shall obtain, in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board, criminal history record information from the Central Criminal Records Exchange of any individual the local board is considering approving as a provider of home-based services pursuant to §

63.2-1600

or adult foster care pursuant to §

63.2-1601

. The local board may also obtain such a criminal records search on all adult household members residing in the home of the individual with whom the adult is to be placed. The local board shall not hire for compensated employment any persons who have been convicted of any offense set forth in clause (i) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

. If approval as an agency approved provider is denied because of information obtained through a Central Criminal Records Exchange search, the local board, upon request, shall provide a copy of the information obtained to the individual who is the subject of the search. Further dissemination of the criminal history record information is prohibited.

In emergency circumstances, each local board may obtain from a criminal justice agency the criminal history record information from the Central Criminal Records Exchange for the criminal records search authorized by this section. The provision of home-based services shall be immediately terminated or the adult shall be removed from the home immediately, if any adult resident has been convicted of any offense set forth in clause (i) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

.

History.

2007, c. 572; 2017, c. 809.

Cross references.

As to dissemination of criminal history record information, see §

19.2-389

.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 809 substituted “any offense set forth in clause (i) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

” for “an offense as defined in §

63.2-1719

” in the third sentence of subsection A; and substituted “any offense set forth in clause (i) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

” for “a barrier crime as described in §

63.2-1719

” in the last sentence of subsection B.

§ 63.2-1602.
Other adult services.

Subject to the supervision and in accordance with regulations of the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services as provided in Article 4 (§

51.5-144

et seq.) of Chapter 14 of Title 51.5, each local board shall:

Participate in nursing home pre-admission screenings of all individuals pursuant to §

32.1-330

;

Provide assisted living facility assessments of residents and applicants pursuant to §

63.2-1804

;

Participate in long-term care service coordination pursuant to §

51.5-138

;

Provide social services or public assistance, as appropriate, to individuals discharged from state hospitals or training centers pursuant to §§

37.2-505

and

37.2-837

; and

Participate in other programs pursuant to state and federal law.

History.

2002, c. 747; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507, 803, 835.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals” for “consumers” in subdivision 4.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, effective July 1, 2013, are identical, and added the language beginning “Subject to the supervision . . .” and ending “of Chapter 14 of Title 51.5” in the introductory language; and updated the section reference in subsection 3.

§ 63.2-1602.1.
Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 61, effective July 1, 2013.

Editor’s note.

Former §

63.2-1602.1

, relating to appeal to Commissioner regarding home-based and adult foster care services, was derived from 2003, c. 467.